Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2175.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-80 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-80. Reserve Forces plates.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered and authorized to
make available to all active and retired members of the United States Reserve Forces of Rhode
Island a special motor vehicle registration plate for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an
automobile or a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of eight thousand five hundred pounds
(8,500 lbs.) twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.) or less.
(b) The special motor vehicle registration plate shall carry on it the designation “US
Reserve Forces” and shall carry on it the titles (Army, Marines, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, and
Coast Guard) arranged on the left hand side of the plate from top to bottom in this order of
precedence, with numerals to the right of the titles and over the United States flag on the plate.
(c) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue the plate upon payment
of a service charge of twenty dollars ($20.00) and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the
plate. All revenues shall be deposited as general revenues.
(d) For the purposes of this section an active or retired member of the United States Reserve
Forces shall be defined as currently serving or having retired under honorable conditions from any
of the Reserve Forces other than the Rhode Island Army or Air National Guard.
(e) In a national state of emergency, any active member of the United States Reserve Forces

driving a vehicle bearing the special motor vehicle registration plate shall be authorized and
empowered to travel upon the highways of the state notwithstanding any driving ban imposed by
any state or municipal authority.
(f) No US Reserve Forces plates shall be issued until at least nine hundred (900) such plates
have been ordered.
(g) A DD 214 showing "honorable discharge" shall be furnished to the division of motor
vehicles for issuance.
(h)(1) Passenger vehicles shall be renewed every two (2) years, and the renewal month
shall be based on the first letter of a registered owner's last name, or the first letter of the name of
the company of which the vehicles are registered.
(2) Commercial vehicles, as defined in subsection (a) of this section, shall be renewed
annually in March.
(i) Upon the death of the veteran, the plates may be transferred to the holder's surviving
spouse for the spouse's lifetime unless or until the spouse remarries.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004235
========
LC004235 - Page 2 of 3